Florida, session 2026, SB1172.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 93 94 Section 1.âParagraph (i) of subsection (1) and paragraph 95 (a) of subsection (3) of section 120.54, Florida Statutes, are 96 amended to read: 97 120.54âRulemaking.â 98 (1)âGENERAL PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO ALL RULES OTHER THAN 99 EMERGENCY RULES.â 100 (i)1.âA rule may incorporate material by reference but only 101 as the material exists on the date the rule is adopted. For 102 purposes of the rule, changes in the material are not effective 103 unless the rule is amended to incorporate the changes. 104 2.âAn agency rule that incorporates by specific reference 105 another rule of that agency automatically incorporates 106 subsequent amendments to the referenced rule unless a contrary 107 intent is clearly indicated in the referencing rule. A notice of 108 amendments to a rule that has been incorporated by specific 109 reference in other rules of that agency must explain the effect 110 of those amendments on the referencing rules. 111 3.âIn rules adopted after December 31, 2010, or reviewed 112 pursuant to s. 120.5435, material may not be incorporated by 113 reference unless: 114 a.âThe material has been submitted in the prescribed 115 electronic format to the Department of State and the full text 116 of the material can be made available for free public access 117 through an electronic hyperlink provided by the Department of 118 State from the rule making the reference in the Florida 119 Administrative Code; or 120 b.âThe agency has determined that posting the material on 121 the Internet for purposes of public examination and inspection 122 would constitute a violation of federal copyright law, in which 123 case a statement to that effect, along with the addresses of the 124 locations at the Department of State and the agency at which the 125 material is available for public inspection and examination, 126 must be included in the notice required by subparagraph (3)(a)1. 127 4.âIn rules proposed after July 1, 2025, material may not 128 be incorporated by reference unless: 129 a.âThe material has been submitted in the prescribed 130 electronic format to the Department of State and the full text 131 of the material, in a text-searchable format, can be made 132 available for free public access through an electronic hyperlink 133 provided by the Department of State from the rule making the 134 reference in the Florida Administrative Register; or 135 b.âThe agency has determined that posting the material on 136 the Internet for purposes of public examination and inspection 137 would constitute a violation of federal copyright law, in which 138 case a statement to that effect, along with the addresses of the 139 locations at the Department of State and the agency at which the 140 material is available for public inspection and examination, 141 must be included in the notice required by subparagraph (3)(a)1. 142 5.âA rule may not be amended by reference only. Amendments 143 must set out the amended rule in full in the same manner as 144 required by the State Constitution for laws. 145 6.âNotwithstanding any contrary provision in this section, 146 when an adopted rule of the Department of Environmental 147 Protection or a water management district is incorporated by 148 reference in the other agencyâs rule to implement a provision of 149 part IV of chapter 373, subsequent amendments to the rule are 150 not effective as to the incorporating rule unless the agency 151 incorporating by reference notifies the committee and the 152 Department of State of its intent to adopt the subsequent 153 amendment, publishes notice of such intent in the Florida 154 Administrative Register, and files with the Department of State 155 a copy of the amended rule incorporated by reference. Changes in 156 the rule incorporated by reference are effective as to the other 157 agency 20 days after the date of the published notice and filing 158 with the Department of State. The Department of State shall 159 amend the history note of the incorporating rule to show the 160 effective date of such change. Any substantially affected person 161 may, within 14 days after the date of publication of the notice 162 of intent in the Florida Administrative Register, file an 163 objection to rulemaking with the agency. The objection must 164 specify the portions of the rule incorporated by reference to 165 which the person objects and the reasons for the objection. The 166 agency does not have the authority under this subparagraph to 167 adopt those portions of the rule specified in such objection. 168 The agency shall publish notice of the objection and of its 169 action in response in the next available issue of the Florida 170 Administrative Register. 171 7.âIf an agency updates or makes a change to a document 172 that the agency created and which is incorporated by reference 173 pursuant to paragraph (3)(a) or subparagraph (3)(e)1., the 174 update or change must be coded by underlining new text and 175 striking through deleted text. 176 8.âThe Department of State may adopt by rule requirements 177 for incorporating materials pursuant to this paragraph. 178 (3)âADOPTION PROCEDURES.â 179 (a)âNotices.â 180 1.âBefore the adoption, amendment, or repeal of any rule 181 other than an emergency rule, an agency shall, upon approval of 182 the agency head, give notice of its intended action. The notice 183 must include the following: 184 a.âA short, plain explanation of the purpose and effect of 185 the proposed action. 186 b.âThe proposed rule number. 187 c.âThe full text of the proposed rule or amendment and a 188 summary thereof. 189 d.âA reference to the grant of rulemaking authority 190 pursuant to which the rule is adopted. 191 e.âA reference to the section or subsection of the Florida 192 Statutes or the Laws of Florida being implemented or 193 interpreted. 194 f.âThe name, e-mail address, and telephone number of the 195 agency employee who may be contacted regarding the intended 196 action. 197 g.âA concise summary of the agencyâs statement of the 198 estimated regulatory costs, if one has been prepared, based on 199 the factors set forth in s. 120.541(2) that describes the 200 regulatory impact of the rule in readable language. 201 h.âAn agency website address where the statement of 202 estimated regulatory costs can be viewed in its entirety, if one 203 has been prepared. 204 i.âA statement that any person who wishes to provide the 205 agency with information regarding the statement of estimated 206 regulatory costs, or to provide a proposal for a lower cost 207 regulatory alternative as provided by s. 120.541(1), must do so 208 in writing within 21 days after publication of the notice. 209 j.âA statement as to whether, based on the statement of the 210 estimated regulatory costs or other information expressly relied 211 upon and described by the agency if no statement of regulatory 212 costs is required, the proposed rule is expected to require 213 legislative ratification pursuant to s. 120.541(3). 214 k.âA description of the procedure for requesting a public 215 hearing on the proposed rule. 216 l.âExcept when the intended action is the repeal of a rule, 217 a reference both to the date on which and to the place where the 218 notice of rule development that is required by subsection (2) 219 appeared. 220 2.âThe notice must be published in the Florida 221 Administrative Register at least 7 days after the notice of rule 222 development and at least 28 days before the intended action. The 223 proposed rule, including all material proposed to be 224 incorporated by reference, must be available for inspection and 225 copying by the public at the time of the publication of notice. 226 Material proposed to be incorporated by reference in the notice 227 must be made available in the manner prescribed by sub 228 subparagraph (1)(i)3.a. or sub-subparagraph (1)(i)3.b. 229 3.âThe notice must be mailed or delivered electronically to 230 all persons named in the proposed rule and mailed or delivered 231 electronically to all persons who, at least 14 days before 232 publication of the notice, have made requests of the agency for 233 advance notice of its proceedings. The agency shall also give 234 such notice as is prescribed by rule to those particular classes 235 of persons to whom the intended action is directed. 236 4.âThe adopting agency shall file with the committee, at 237 least 21 days before the proposed adoption date, a copy of each 238 rule it proposes to adopt; a copy of any material incorporated 239 by reference in the rule; a detailed written statement of the 240 facts and circumstances justifying the proposed rule; a copy of 241 any statement of estimated regulatory costs that has been 242 prepared pursuant to s. 120.541; a statement of the extent to 243 which the proposed rule relates to federal standards or rules on 244 the same subject; and the notice required by subparagraph 1. 245 5.âIf any of the information that is required to be 246 included in the notice under subparagraph 1., other than 247 substantive changes to the rule text, is omitted or is 248 incorrect, the agency must publish a notice of correction in the 249 Florida Administrative Register at least 7 days before the 250 intended agency action. The publication of a notice of 251 correction does not affect the timeframes for filing the rule 252 for adoption as set forth in paragraph (e). Technical changes 253 must be published as a notice of correction. The notice of 254 correction must be approved by the Department of State before 255 publication of the notice. 256 Section 2.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) and subsections 257 (3), (5), and (8) of section 120.5435, Florida Statutes, are 258 amended to read: 259 120.5435âAgency review of rules.â 260 (2) 261 (b)âBeginning October 1, 2025, each agency shall include a 262 list of its existing rules in its annual regulatory plan, 263 prepared and submitted pursuant to s. 120.74. The agency shall 264 include a schedule of the rules it will review each year during 265 the 5-year rule review period and a summary of the agencyâs 266 intended action, consistent with the actions identified in 267 subsection (5), on each rule identified for review during the 268 next 12 months. The agency may amend its yearly schedule in 269 subsequent regulatory plans, but must provide for the completed 270 review of at least 20 percent of the agencyâs rules per year, 271 until all of its subject rules have been reviewed. 272 (3)âAny rule initially adopted, any existing rule amended, 273 or any rule reviewed pursuant to this section, for which such 274 adoption, amendment, or review occurred after July 1, 2025, must 275 be reviewed in accordance with this section in the 5th fifth 276 year following the adoption, amendment, or review. Such review 277 must be completed before the day that marks the 6th sixth year 278 since the adoption of the rule. 279 (5)âBy January 1 of each year, the agency shall submit to 280 the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of 281 Representatives, and the committee a report that summarizes the 282 agencyâs intended action on each rule under review during the 283 current fiscal year. 284 (7)(8)âThe rule review is completed upon: 285 (a)âThe agency, upon approval of the agency head or his or 286 her designee, electronically filing a certified copy of the 287 reviewed rule to which no changes or only technical changes were 288 made, and the committeeâs certification granted pursuant to 289 subsection (6) (7), with the Department of State; or 290 (b)âThe agency, for a reviewed rule subject to substantive 291 change or repeal, timely filing the appropriate notice pursuant 292 to s. 120.54. 293 Section 3.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 294 120.55, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 295 120.55âPublication.â 296 (1)âThe Department of State shall: 297 (a)1.âThrough a continuous revision and publication system, 298 compile and publish electronically, on a website managed by the 299 department, the âFlorida Administrative Code.â The Florida 300 Administrative Code must contain all rules adopted by each 301 agency, citing the grant of rulemaking authority and the 302 specific law implemented pursuant to which each rule was 303 adopted, all history notes as authorized in ss. 120.5435 and 304 120.545(7), complete indexes to all rules and any material 305 incorporated by reference contained in the code, and any other 306 material required or authorized by law or deemed useful by the 307 department. The electronic code must display each rule chapter 308 currently in effect in browse mode and allow full text search of 309 the code and each rule chapter. The department may contract with 310 a publishing firm for a printed publication; however, the 311 department retains responsibility for the code as provided in 312 this section. The electronic publication is the official 313 compilation of the administrative rules of the this state. The 314 Department of State retains the copyright over the Florida 315 Administrative Code. 316 2.âRules general in form but applicable to only one school 317 district, community college district, or county, or a part 318 thereof, or state university rules relating to internal 319 personnel or business and finance may not be published in the 320 Florida Administrative Code. Exclusion from publication in the 321 Florida Administrative Code does not affect the validity or 322 effectiveness of such rules. 323 3.âAt the beginning of the section of the code dealing with 324 an agency that files copies of its rules with the department, 325 the department shall publish the address and telephone number of 326 the executive offices of each agency, the manner by which the 327 agency indexes its rules, a listing of all rules of that agency 328 excluded from publication in the code, a listing of all forms 329 and material incorporated by reference adopted by rule which are 330 used by the agency, and a statement as to where those rules may 331 be inspected. 332 4.âForms may not be published in the Florida Administrative 333 Code; but any form which an agency uses in its dealings with the 334 public, along with any accompanying instructions, must be filed 335 with the committee before it is used. Any form or instruction 336 which meets the definition of the term âruleâ provided in s. 337 120.52 must be incorporated by reference into the appropriate 338 rule. The reference must specifically state that the form is 339 being incorporated by reference and include the number, title, 340 and effective date of the form and an explanation of how the 341 form may be obtained. Each form created by an agency which is 342 incorporated by reference in a rule notice of which is given 343 under s. 120.54(3)(a) after December 31, 2007, must clearly 344 display the number, title, and effective date of the form and 345 the number of the rule in which the form is incorporated. 346 5.âAfter December 31, 2025, the department shall require 347 any material incorporated by reference in adopted rules to be 348 filed in the manner prescribed by s. 120.54(1)(i)4.a. or b s. 349 120.54(1)(i)3.a. or b. When a proposed rule is filed for 350 adoption with incorporated material in electronic form, the 351 departmentâs publication of the Florida Administrative Code on 352 its website must contain a hyperlink from the incorporating 353 reference in the rule directly to that material. The department 354 may not allow hyperlinks from rules in the Florida 355 Administrative Code to any material other than that filed with 356 and maintained by the department, but may allow hyperlinks to 357 incorporated material maintained by the department from the 358 adopting agencyâs website or other sites. 359 6.âThe department shall include the date of any technical 360 changes in the history note of the rule in the Florida 361 Administrative Code. A technical change does not affect the 362 effective date of the rule. A technical change made after the 363 adoption of a rule must be published as a notice of correction. 364 Section 4.âPresent subsections (2) through (9) of section 365 120.65, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (5) 366 through (12), respectively, new subsections (2), (3), and (4) 367 and subsection (13) are added to that section, paragraph (e) is 368 added to present subsection (8) of that section, and subsection 369 (1) of that section is amended, to read: 370 120.65âAdministrative law judges.â 371 (1)âThe Division of Administrative Hearings within the 372 Department of Management Services shall be headed by a director 373 who shall be appointed by the Administration Commission for a 374 term of 4 years from a list of three names submitted by the 375 statewide nominating commission pursuant to subsection (2) and 376 confirmed by the Senate. The director, who shall also serve as 377 the chief administrative law judge, and any deputy chief 378 administrative law judge must possess the same minimum 379 qualifications as the administrative law judges employed by the 380 division. The Deputy Chief Judge of Compensation Claims must 381 possess the minimum qualifications established in s. 440.45(2) 382 and shall report to the director. The division shall be a 383 separate budget entity, and the director shall be its agency 384 head for all purposes. The Department of Management Services 385 shall provide administrative support and service to the division 386 to the extent requested by the director. The division shall not 387 be subject to control, supervision, or direction by the 388 Department of Management Services in any manner, including, but 389 not limited to, personnel, purchasing, transactions involving 390 real or personal property, and budgetary matters. 391 (2)(a)âThe Administration Commission shall appoint full 392 time administrative law judges to conduct proceedings as 393 required by this chapter or other law. A person may not be 394 nominated to serve as an administrative law judge unless he or 395 she has been a member of The Florida Bar in good standing for 396 the previous 5 years. An administrative law judge may not engage 397 in the private practice of law during his or her term of office. 398 (b)âExcept as provided in paragraph (c), the Administration 399 Commission shall appoint an administrative law judge from a list 400 of three persons nominated by the statewide nominating 401 commission. The statewide nominating commission must be composed 402 of all of the following: 403 1.âSix members, at least one of whom must also be a member 404 of a minority group as defined in s. 288.703, one of each of 405 whom reside in each of the territorial jurisdictions of the 406 district courts of appeal, appointed by the Board of Governors 407 of The Florida Bar from among members of The Florida Bar engaged 408 in the practice of law. Each member is appointed for a 4-year 409 term. 410 2.âSix members, at least one of whom must also be a member 411 of a minority group as defined in s. 288.703, one of each of 412 whom reside in each of the territorial jurisdictions of the 413 district courts of appeal, appointed by the Governor. Each 414 member is appointed for a 4-year term. 415 3.âSix members, at least one of whom must also be a member 416 of a minority group as defined in s. 288.703, one of each of 417 whom reside in each of the territorial jurisdictions of the 418 district courts of appeal, selected and appointed by a majority 419 vote of the other 12 members of the commission. Each member is 420 appointed for a 4-year term. 421 422 A vacancy occurring on the commission must be filled by the 423 original appointing authority for the unexpired balance of the 424 term. An attorney who appears before any administrative law 425 judge more than 4 times in a calendar year is not eligible to 426 serve on the statewide nominating commission. The meetings and 427 determinations of the nominating commission must be open to the 428 public. 429 (c)âEach administrative law judge shall be appointed for a 430 term of 4 years, but during the term of office may be removed by 431 the Administration Commission for cause. Before the expiration 432 of a judgeâs term of office, the statewide nominating commission 433 shall review the judgeâs conduct and determine whether the 434 judgeâs performance is satisfactory. In determining whether a 435 judgeâs performance is satisfactory, the nominating commission 436 shall consider the extent to which the judge has met the 437 requirements of this chapter. If the judgeâs performance is 438 deemed satisfactory, the nominating commission must report its 439 finding to the Administration Commission no later than 6 months 440 before the expiration of the judgeâs term of office. The 441 Administration Commission shall review the nominating 442 commissionâs report and may reappoint the judge for an 443 additional 4-year term. If the Administration Commission does 444 not reappoint the judge, the Administration Commission must 445 inform the nominating commission. The judge shall remain in 446 office until the Administration Commission has appointed a 447 successor judge in accordance with paragraphs (a) and (b). If a 448 vacancy occurs during a judgeâs unexpired term, the nominating 449 commission determines the judgeâs performance is unsatisfactory, 450 or the Administration Commission does not reappoint the judge, 451 the Administration Commission must appoint a successor judge for 452 a term of 4 years in accordance with paragraph (b). 453 (d)âThe Administration Commission may appoint an attorney 454 who has at least 5 years of experience in the practice of law in 455 this state to serve as an administrative law judge pro hac vice 456 to serve temporarily as an additional administrative law judge 457 in the absence or disqualification of any full-time 458 administrative law judge. However, an attorney who is appointed 459 may not serve for a period of more than 120 successive days. 460 (e)âThe director of the Division of Administrative Hearings 461 may receive or initiate complaints, conduct investigations, and 462 dismiss complaints against any administrative law judge on the 463 basis of the Code of Judicial Conduct. The director may 464 recommend to the Administration Commission the removal of an 465 administrative law judge or recommend discipline of a judge 466 whose conduct during his or her term of office warrants such 467 discipline. For the purposes of this section, the term 468 âdisciplineâ includes a reprimand, fine, or suspension with or 469 without pay. At the conclusion of each investigation, the 470 director shall submit preliminary findings of fact and 471 recommendations to the administrative law judge who is the 472 subject of the complaint. The administrative law judge has 20 473 days after receipt of such facts and recommendations to respond 474 to the preliminary findings. The response and the directorâs 475 rebuttal to the response must be included in a final report 476 submitted to the Administration Commission. 477 (3)âAdministrative law judges shall seek to ensure 478 consistency in the actions of the division. To this end, 479 administrative law judges are bound by stare decisis and 480 precedent. Consistency between final orders and recommended 481 final orders rendered by the division is the foundation of 482 public trust and confidence, and any inconsistency between 483 decisions must be distinguished in rendering final or 484 recommended final orders. 485 (4)âThe director of the Division of Administrative Hearings 486 shall establish training and continuing education for new and 487 sitting administrative law judges. 488 (11)(8)âNot later than February 1 of each year, the 489 division shall issue a written report to the Administrative 490 Procedures Committee and the Administration Commission, 491 including at least the following information: 492 (e)âAn accounting, by agency and entity, of the payments or 493 reimbursement received for administrative law judge services. 494 (13)âThe Division of Administrative Hearings shall adopt 495 rules to carry out this section. Such rules must include 496 procedural rules governing hearings and uniform criteria for 497 measuring and evaluating the performance of the administrative 498 law judges, including, but not limited to, the number of cases 499 assigned and resolved, the age of pending and resolved cases, 500 timeliness of decisions, extraordinary fee awards, and other 501 data necessary for the judicial nominating commission to review 502 the performance of judges as required in paragraph (2)(c). 503 Section 5.âParagraphs (e), (f), and (g) of subsection (1) 504 and paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 120.74, Florida 505 Statutes, are amended to read: 506 120.74âAgency annual rulemaking and regulatory plans; 507 reports.â 508 (1)âREGULATORY PLAN.âBy October 1 of each year, each agency 509 shall prepare a regulatory plan. 510 (e)âThe plan also includes all of the following: 511 1.âA list of the agencyâs existing rules scheduled for 512 review during the next 12 months pursuant to s. 120.5435. 513 2.âA 5-year schedule for the review of all existing rules 514 as of July 1, 2025. The agency may amend this schedule, if 515 necessary. 516 3.âA summary of the agencyâs intended action on each rule 517 identified for review during the next 12 months A yearly 518 schedule for the rules it will review each year during the 5 519 year rule review. The agency may amend this schedule, if 520 necessary. 521 (f)âThe plan must include any desired update to the prior 522 yearâs regulatory plan or supplement thereof, published pursuant 523 to subsection (5). If, in a prior year, the agency identified a 524 rule under this paragraph as one requiring review pursuant to s. 525 120.5435, but the agency has not yet completed an action 526 described in s. 120.5435 s. 120.5435(5): 527 1.âThe agency must identify and list such rule in its 528 regulatory plan as an untimely rule review and notify the 529 committee of such action; or 530 2.âIf the agency subsequently determined that the rule 531 review is not necessary, the agency must identify the rule and 532 provide a concise written explanation of the reason why the rule 533 does not require a rule review. 534 (g)1.âBeginning October 1, 2025, each agency issuing 535 licenses in accordance with s. 120.60 shall track the agencyâs 536 compliance with the licensing timeframes established in s. 537 120.60, and beginning October 1, 2026, must include in the 538 regulatory plan required by subsection (1) all of the following 539 information regarding its licensing activities of the prior 540 fiscal year, categorized by type of license: 541 a.âThe number of license applications submitted to the 542 agency. 543 b.âThe number of license applications that required one or 544 more requests for additional information. 545 c.âThe number of license applications for which the 546 applicant was nonresponsive to one or more requests for 547 additional information. 548 d.âThe number of license applications that were not 549 completed by the applicant. 550 e.âThe number of license applications for which the agency 551 requested that the applicant grant an extension of time for the 552 agency to issue a request for additional information, determine 553 that an application is complete, or issue a decision to approve 554 or deny an application. 555 f.âThe number of license applications for which an 556 extension was requested by the applicant and for which an 557 extension was required by the state agency or judicial branch. 558 g.âThe number of license applications that were not 559 approved or denied within the statutory timeframe. 560 h.âThe average and median number of days it takes the 561 agency to approve or deny an application after receipt of a 562 completed application. 563 i.âThe number of license applications for which final 564 agency action was appealed and the number of informal and formal 565 hearings requested. 566 j.âThe number of employees dedicated to processing license 567 applications, if available. 568 2.âNo later than December 31 of each year, the committee 569 must submit a consolidated annual agency licensing performance 570 report that provides all of the information required by 571 subparagraph 1. The Department of State must publish a hyperlink 572 to a dedicated website that contains the regulatory plans these 573 reports in the first available issue of the Florida 574 Administrative Register. 575 (2)âPUBLICATION AND DELIVERY TO THE COMMITTEE.â 576 (a)âBy October 1 of each year, each agency shall: 577 1.âPublish its regulatory plan on its website or on another 578 state website established for publication of administrative law 579 records. A clearly labeled hyperlink to the current plan must be 580 included on the agencyâs primary website homepage. 581 2.âElectronically deliver to the committee a copy of the 582 certification required in paragraph (1)(d). 583 3.âPublish in the Florida Administrative Register a notice 584 identifying the date of publication of the agencyâs regulatory 585 plan. The notice must include a hyperlink or website address 586 providing direct access to the published plan. 587 Section 6.âParagraph (e) of subsection (6) of section 588 627.351, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 589 627.351âInsurance risk apportionment plans.â 590 (6)âCITIZENS PROPERTY INSURANCE CORPORATION.â 591 (e)âThe corporation is subject to s. 287.057 for the 592 purchase of commodities and contractual services except as 593 otherwise provided in this paragraph. Services provided by 594 tradepersons or technical experts to assist a licensed adjuster 595 in the evaluation of individual claims are not subject to the 596 procurement requirements of this section. Additionally, the 597 procurement of financial services providers and underwriters 598 must be made pursuant to s. 627.3513. Contracts for goods or 599 services valued at or more than $100,000 are subject to approval 600 by the board. 601 1.âThe corporation is an agency for purposes of s. 287.057, 602 except that, for purposes of s. 287.057(24), the corporation is 603 an eligible user. 604 a.âThe authority of the Department of Management Services 605 and the Chief Financial Officer under s. 287.057 extends to the 606 corporation as if the corporation were an agency. 607 b.âThe executive director of the corporation is the agency 608 head under s. 287.057. The executive director of the corporation 609 may assign or appoint a designee to act on his or her behalf. 610 2.âThe corporation must provide notice of a decision or 611 intended decision concerning a solicitation, contract award, or 612 exceptional purchase by electronic posting. Such notice must 613 contain the following statement: âFailure to file a protest 614 within the time prescribed in this section constitutes a waiver 615 of proceedings.â 616 a.âA person adversely affected by the corporationâs 617 decision or intended decision to award a contract pursuant to s. 618 287.057(1) or (3)(c) who elects to challenge the decision must 619 file a written notice of protest with the executive director of 620 the corporation within 72 hours after the corporation posts a 621 notice of its decision or intended decision. For a protest of 622 the terms, conditions, and specifications contained in a 623 solicitation, including provisions governing the methods for 624 ranking bids, proposals, replies, awarding contracts, reserving 625 rights of further negotiation, or modifying or amending any 626 contract, the notice of protest must be filed in writing within 627 72 hours after posting the solicitation. Saturdays, Sundays, and 628 state holidays are excluded in the computation of the 72-hour 629 time period. 630 b.âA formal written protest must be filed within 10 days 631 after the date the notice of protest is filed. The formal 632 written protest must state with particularity the facts and law 633 upon which the protest is based. Upon receipt of a formal 634 written protest that has been timely filed, the corporation must 635 stop the solicitation or contract award process until the 636 subject of the protest is resolved by final board action unless 637 the executive director sets forth in writing particular facts 638 and circumstances that require the continuance of the 639 solicitation or contract award process without delay in order to 640 avoid an immediate and serious danger to the public health, 641 safety, or welfare. 642 (I)âThe corporation must provide an opportunity to resolve 643 the protest by mutual agreement between the parties within 7 644 business days after receipt of the formal written protest. 645 (II)âIf the subject of a protest is not resolved by mutual 646 agreement within 7 business days, the corporationâs board must 647 transmit the protest to the Division of Administrative Hearings 648 and contract with the division to conduct a hearing to determine 649 the merits of the protest and to issue a recommended order. The 650 contract must provide for the corporation to reimburse the 651 division for any costs incurred by the division for court 652 reporters, transcript preparation, travel, facility rental, and 653 other customary hearing costs in the manner set forth in s. 654 120.65(12) s. 120.65(9). The division has jurisdiction to 655 determine the facts and law concerning the protest and to issue 656 a recommended order. The divisionâs rules and procedures apply 657 to these proceedings. The protest must be heard by the division 658 at a publicly noticed meeting in accordance with procedures 659 established by the division. 660 c.âIn a protest of an invitation-to-bid or request-for 661 proposals procurement, submissions made after the bid or 662 proposal opening which amend or supplement the bid or proposal 663 may not be considered. In protesting an invitation-to-negotiate 664 procurement, submissions made after the corporation announces 665 its intent to award a contract, reject all replies, or withdraw 666 the solicitation that amends or supplements the reply may not be 667 considered. Unless otherwise provided by law, the burden of 668 proof rests with the party protesting the corporationâs action. 669 In a competitive-procurement protest, other than a rejection of 670 all bids, proposals, or replies, the administrative law judge 671 must conduct a de novo proceeding to determine whether the 672 corporationâs proposed action is contrary to the corporationâs 673 governing statutes, the corporationâs rules or policies, or the 674 solicitation specifications. The standard of proof for the 675 proceeding is whether the corporationâs action was clearly 676 erroneous, contrary to competition, arbitrary, or capricious. In 677 any bid-protest proceeding contesting an intended corporation 678 action to reject all bids, proposals, or replies, the standard 679 of review by the board is whether the corporationâs intended 680 action is illegal, arbitrary, dishonest, or fraudulent. 681 d.âFailure to file a notice of protest or failure to file a 682 formal written protest constitutes a waiver of proceedings. 683 3.âThe agency head or his or her designee shall consider 684 the recommended order of an administrative law judge and take 685 final action on the protest. Any further legal remedy lies with 686 the First District Court of Appeal. 687 Section 7.âSubsections (6) and (7) of section 766.207, 688 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 689 766.207âVoluntary binding arbitration of medical negligence 690 claims.â 691 (6)âThe rate of compensation for medical negligence claims 692 arbitrators must other than the administrative law judge shall 693 be set by the chief judge of the appropriate circuit court by 694 schedule providing for compensation of not less than $250 per 695 day nor more than $750 per day or as agreed by the parties. In 696 setting the schedule, the chief judge shall consider the 697 prevailing rates charged for the delivery of professional 698 services in the community. 699 (7)âArbitration pursuant to this section precludes shall 700 preclude recourse to any other remedy by the claimant against 701 any participating defendant, and must shall be undertaken with 702 the understanding that damages must shall be awarded as provided 703 by general law, including the Wrongful Death Act, subject to the 704 following limitations: 705 (a)âNet economic damages are shall be awardable, including, 706 but not limited to, past and future medical expenses and 80 707 percent of wage loss and loss of earning capacity, offset by any 708 collateral source payments. 709 (b)âNoneconomic damages are shall be limited to a maximum 710 of $250,000 per incident, and must shall be calculated on a 711 percentage basis with respect to capacity to enjoy life, so that 712 a finding that the claimantâs injuries resulted in a 50-percent 713 reduction in his or her capacity to enjoy life would warrant an 714 award of not more than $125,000 noneconomic damages. 715 (c)âDamages for future economic losses must shall be 716 awarded to be paid by periodic payments pursuant to s. 717 766.202(9) and must shall be offset by future collateral source 718 payments. 719 (d)âPunitive damages may shall not be awarded. 720 (e)âThe defendant is shall be responsible for the payment 721 of interest on all accrued damages with respect to which 722 interest would be awarded at trial. 723 (f)âThe defendant must shall pay the claimantâs reasonable 724 attorney attorneyâs fees and costs, as determined by the 725 arbitration panel, but in no event more than 15 percent of the 726 award, reduced to present value. 727 (g)âThe defendant must shall pay all the costs of the 728 arbitration proceeding and the fees of all the arbitrators other 729 than the administrative law judge. 730 (h)âEach defendant who submits to arbitration under this 731 section is shall be jointly and severally liable for all damages 732 assessed pursuant to this section. 733 (i)âThe defendantâs obligation to pay the claimantâs 734 damages is shall be for the purpose of arbitration under this 735 section only. A defendantâs or claimantâs offer to arbitrate may 736 shall not be used in evidence or in argument during any 737 subsequent litigation of the claim following the rejection 738 thereof. 739 (j)âThe fact of making or accepting an offer to arbitrate 740 is shall not be admissible as evidence of liability in any 741 collateral or subsequent proceeding on the claim. 742 (k)âAny offer by a claimant to arbitrate must be made to 743 each defendant against whom the claimant has made a claim. Any 744 offer by a defendant to arbitrate must be made to each claimant 745 who has joined in the notice of intent to initiate litigation, 746 as provided in s. 766.106. A defendant who rejects a claimantâs 747 offer to arbitrate is shall be subject to the provisions of s. 748 766.209(3). A claimant who rejects a defendantâs offer to 749 arbitrate is shall be subject to the provisions of s. 750 766.209(4). 751 (l)âThe hearing must shall be conducted by all of the 752 arbitrators, but a majority may determine any question of fact 753 and render a final decision. The chief arbitrator shall decide 754 all evidentiary matters. 755 756 The provisions of This subsection does shall not preclude 757 settlement at any time by mutual agreement of the parties. 758 Section 8.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.